Utah statutes.
51-2a-202.   Reporting requirements.
(1)  The governing board of each entity required to have an audit, review,
compilation, or fiscal report shall ensure that the audit, review,
compilation, or fiscal report is:
(a)  made at least annually; and
(b)  filed with the state auditor within six months of the close of the fiscal
year of the entity.
(2)  If the political subdivision, interlocal organization, or other local
entity receives federal funding, the audit, review, or compilation shall be
performed in accordance with both federal and state auditing requirements.
